Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
ARTICLE 14
BOND ANTICIPATION NOTE ACT

Section

29-14-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Bond Anticipation Note Act".

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1419, § 1, effective July 1.

29-14-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby declares that the issuance of bond anticipation notes by any public body as defined in section 29-14-103 (6), when advantageous to the public body or the citizens thereof, will serve a public use and will promote the health, safety, security, and general welfare of the citizens thereof and of the people of the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1419, § 1, effective July 1.

29-14-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Bond" means any bond, debenture, or other obligation authorized to be issued by a public body pursuant to any provision of law of the state.

"Bond anticipation note" means any note, interim debenture, or other security evidencing an obligation and issued pursuant to this article.

"Governing body" means a city council, board of trustees, commission, board of county commissioners, board of directors, or other legislative body of a public body in which the legislative powers of such public body are vested.

"Indebtedness" means any bond issued by a public body pursuant to any law of this state which constitutes a debt for the purposes of section 6 of article XI of the state constitution, and the issuance of which must be submitted to a vote of the qualified electors of such public body pursuant to said section.

"Legislative act" means an ordinance adopted by a governing body of a municipality or a resolution adopted by a governing body of any other public body.

"Public body" means any county; any municipality as defined by section 31-1-101 (6), C.R.S.; any school district; any special district as defined in section 32-1-103 (20), C.R.S.; and any water conservancy district, city housing authority, county housing authority, urban renewal agency, downtown development authority, or community redevelopment agency, any corporate authority, any corporate commission, or any other political subdivision of this state constituting a body corporate.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1419, § 1, effective July 1.

29-14-104. Issuance of bond anticipation notes.

Any public body may issue from time to time its bond anticipation notes for any purposes lawfully authorized to be undertaken by such public body or to redeem outstanding bond anticipation notes. Such bond anticipation notes shall be issued in anticipation of the issuance of bonds by the public body.

Except as provided in this article, the bond anticipation notes shall be issued pursuant to the provisions of law which govern the issuance of the bonds in anticipation of which the bond anticipation notes are being issued.

Bond anticipation notes issued pursuant to this article shall be payable from the proceeds of the sale of additional bond anticipation notes or from the proceeds of the sale of the bonds of the public body or other moneys of the public body legally available for such purpose.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1420, § 1, effective July 1.

29-14-105. Bond anticipation note details.

Any bond anticipation notes may mature at such time not exceeding a period of time equal to the estimated time needed to effect the purpose for which they are issued, but not exceeding five years from the date or respective dates of the bond anticipation notes, as the governing body may determine. Bond anticipation notes may be issued in such denominations as determined by the governing body.

The interest rate per annum on the bond anticipation notes shall be stated in the legislative act authorizing the issuance of the bond anticipation notes. Said interest rate may be evidenced by one or more set of coupons attached to said bond anticipation notes. Said interest rate need not be fixed at the time of the passage of such legislative act but may vary based on a fixed formula determined by the governing body and set forth in the legislative act authorizing the issuance of the bond anticipation notes. Said variable interest rate may not exceed the authorized maximum net effective interest rate.

The bond anticipation notes may be sold, at, above, or below the principal amounts thereof, as may be in the public interest.

The bond anticipation notes may be sold at either public or private sale, as determined by the governing body.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1420, § 1, effective July 1.

29-14-106. Limitations on issuance.

If the bond anticipation notes are being issued in anticipation of bonds which constitute an indebtedness, such bond anticipation notes shall not be issued:

Unless the bonds have been authorized at an election as required by section 6 of article XI of the state constitution;

In a principal amount in excess of the amount of bonds authorized to be issued at such election;

At a maximum net effective interest rate higher than the maximum net effective interest rate at which such bonds may be issued;

Unless the proceeds of such bond anticipation notes are to be used for the same purpose for which the bonds may be issued; and

Unless the principal amount of the bond anticipation note together with the outstanding principal amount of other indebtedness of the public body is within the applicable limitation on the issuance of such indebtedness by the public body, if any.

When bond anticipation notes are issued in anticipation of the issuance of bonds which constitute an indebtedness and which have been authorized at an election, a principal amount of the bonds so authorized equal to the original principal amount of the bond anticipation notes issued shall be issued solely for the purpose of retiring such bond anticipation notes. If such bond anticipation notes are retired from other legally available revenues of the public bonds, said bonds in such principal amount shall not be issued unless reauthorized at an election held in accordance with the state constitution and other laws of this state.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1421, § 1, effective July 1.

29-14-107. No action maintainable.

No action or proceeding, at law or in equity, to review any acts or proceedings, or to question the validity or enjoin the performance of any act, or the issuance of any bond anticipation notes authorized by this article, or for any other relief against any acts or proceedings done or had under this article, whether based upon irregularities or jurisdictional defects, shall be maintained, unless commenced within thirty days after the performance of the act or the effective date of the legislative act complained of, or else be thereafter perpetually barred.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1421, § 1, effective July 1.

29-14-108. Validation.

All bond anticipation notes and any coupons appertaining thereto issued or purportedly issued prior to July 1, 1981, and all acts or proceedings had or taken or purportedly had or taken prior to said date by or on behalf of public bodies, under law or under color of law, preliminary to and in the authorization, execution, sale, and issuance of all bond anticipation notes, including any coupons appertaining thereto, and the exercise of other powers in this article are validated, ratified, approved, and confirmed by this section except as provided in section 29-14-109, notwithstanding any lack of power, authority, or otherwise, other than constitutional, and notwithstanding any defects and irregularities other than constitutional, in such bond anticipation notes, acts, and proceedings, in such authorization, execution, sale, and issuance, and in such exercise of power; and such bond anticipation notes are and shall be binding, legal, valid, and enforceable obligations of such public body to which they appertain in accordance with their terms and their authorization proceedings.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1421, § 1, effective July 1.

29-14-109. Effect of and limitations upon validation.

This article shall operate to supply such legislative authority as may be necessary to validate any such bond anticipation notes issued prior to July 1, 1981, of such public bodies and any acts and proceedings taken appertaining to the issuance of such bond anticipation notes by such public bodies or otherwise prior to said date which the general assembly could have supplied or provided for in the law under which such bond anticipation notes were issued or such other contracts were executed and such acts or proceedings where taken; but this article shall be limited to the validation of such bond anticipation notes, acts, and proceedings to the extent to which the same can be effectuated under the state and federal constitutions. This article shall not operate to validate, ratify, approve, confirm, or legalize any bond anticipation note or coupon, act, proceeding, or other matter, the legality of which is being contested or inquired into in any legal proceeding now pending and undetermined, and shall not operate to confirm, validate, or legalize any bond anticipation note or coupon, act, proceeding, or other matter which, prior to July 1, 1981, has been determined in any legal proceeding to be illegal, void, or ineffective.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1422, § 1, effective July 1.

29-14-110. Application to certain public bodies.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the provisions of this article shall apply to home rule municipalities except insofar as superseded by charter or ordinance passed pursuant to such charter and shall apply to special territorial charter municipalities.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1422, § 1, effective July 1.